North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4.1 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4.1-32 Rendering Plants

Source:

S.L. 2017, sb2028, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-32-01.
License required to operate rendering plant.

A person may not operate a rendering plant or other establishment using the carcasses of domestic or wild animals, not intended for human consumption, for processing without first obtaining a license from the agriculture commissioner. A license to operate a rendering plant may be issued only upon a written application filed with the commissioner in accordance with this chapter and rules adopted by the board.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-32-02.
Inspection of rendering plant of applicant by state veterinarian.

The state veterinarian shall inspect an establishment for which a license is requested to operate a rendering plant, including its equipment and vehicles and the manner in which its business is conducted, with reference and due regard to the danger of animal disease transmission and dissemination, upon the receipt of an application for a license to operate a rendering plant or other establishment for processing the carcasses of domestic or wild animals, not intended for human consumption.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-32-03.
Granting of license — Fee — Term.

The agriculture commissioner shall issue a license to operate a rendering plant, if the inspection does not reveal any danger of animal disease transmission, upon payment of a fee of fifty dollars. The license is valid for a period of one year from the date of issuance unless it is revoked for cause by the commissioner before expiration.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-32-04.
Unloading chutes and vehicles used by rendering plant — Regulations governing.

Any unloading places or chutes used by a rendering plant or establishment must be on cement floors that can be cleaned and disinfected. Every vehicle used for transporting carcasses of dead animals to a rendering plant or establishment must:

Have a bed or tank not less than fifty inches [127 centimeters] in width which is all metal, metal lined, or watertight for at least six inches [15.24 centimeters] above the floor of the box or bed of the vehicle.

Have a metal-lined endgate that is hinged at the bottom of the bed or box of the vehicle and is fastened firmly to the top of the bed or box of the vehicle when closed.

Have sides, a top, and an endgate that will prevent flies and other insects from entering the vehicle.

Carry a tank filled with a solution approved by the state veterinarian for use as a disinfectant.

Be disinfected with the solution described in subdivision d after it has been used for collecting a dead animal and before it enters upon any public highway of this state. Special attention must be given to all those parts of the vehicle which came in contact with the ground while upon the premises.

Be thoroughly washed and disinfected with the solution described in subdivision d or with live steam, or both, after the dead animal has been unloaded at the rendering plant.

The operator of any vehicle used for transporting the carcasses of dead animals to a rendering plant shall wash with disinfectant, paying special attention to disinfecting the operator’s hands and footwear, with the solution described in subdivision d of subsection 1 immediately after leaving any farm at which the operator has collected the carcass of a dead animal.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-32-05.
Removal of carcasses from vehicle — Prohibition.

A carcass collected at any farm in this state may not be removed from the vehicle except at a rendering plant or other establishment using the carcasses of domestic or wild animals, not intended for human consumption, for processing and final disposal.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-32-06.
Operator of vehicle for rendering plant to have certificate.

Any person operating a vehicle for an establishment licensed under this chapter must have an authorized certificate from the establishment which has been approved by the agriculture commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-32-07.
Inspection of plant authorized.

The operator of any establishment licensed under this chapter shall permit an official authorized by the state veterinarian or any health officer to inspect the licensed establishment at any time.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-32-08.
Rendering done by packing plants operating under federal inspection — Exception.

All rendering done by a packing plant operating under federal inspection in a building adjacent to or on the same premises as the packing plant is exempt from the provisions of this chapter, except that the transportation by the packing plant or any establishment licensed under this chapter of carcasses and other animal substances on any public highway or street is subject to the sanitary requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted by the state board of animal health.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-32-09.
Money collected — Where credited.

Money collected under this chapter must be deposited in the general fund by the state treasurer.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-32-10.
Restrictions on locating rendering plants.

An establishment licensed under this chapter may not be constructed within three miles [4.83 kilometers] of the limits of any municipality or within one mile [1.61 kilometers] of any farmstead unless the owner of the farmstead gives written consent.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-32-11.
Penalty.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.